Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 7. Temporary Absentee Registration for Federal Elections.

§§ 24.2-440 through 24.2-443.
Repealed by Acts 2012, c. 353, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions, see the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act, Chapter 4.1 (24.2-451 et seq.).

Editor’s note.

Former
§

24.2-440

, pertaining to eligibility for temporary registration by absentee application, derived from Acts 1977, c. 305, § 24.1-72.12; 1980, c. 639; 1993, c. 641. Former § 24.2-441, pertaining to application for temporary registration, derived from Acts 1977, c. 305, § 24.1-72.13; 1982, c. 650; 1993, c. 641; 2000, c. 328; 2004, c. 410. Former
§ 24.2-442, pertaining to when registration permitted; lapse of registration, derived from Acts 1977, c. 305, § 24.1-72.14; 1993, c. 641; 2004, c. 410; 2007, c. 311; 2010, cc. 449, 645; 2011, cc. 427, 458. Former § 24.2-443, pertaining to absentee ballots for persons registered under this article, derived from Acts 1977, c. 305, § 24.1-72.15; 1993, c. 641; 1999, c. 154.